apertium-la-en.la.dix
    <pardef n="/ire__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibo</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibimus</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibis</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibitis</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibit</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibunt</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iero</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ierimus</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieris</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieritis</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ierit</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ierint</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ftp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ite</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ito</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>itote</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ito</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eunto</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ii</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ivi</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iimus</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isti</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>istis</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iit</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ierunt</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ire</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isse</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="infp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieram</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieramus</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieras</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieratis</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ierat</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ierant</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pmp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>issem</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>issemus</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isses</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>issetis</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isset</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>issent</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pms"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ierim</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ierimus</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieris</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieritis</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ierit</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ierint</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pfs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibam</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibamus</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibas</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibatis</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibat</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ibant</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irem</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iremus</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ires</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iretis</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iret</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irent</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eunte</l>
          <r>ire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="act"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>

    <e lm="ire"><i></i><par n="/ire__vblex"/></e>
